Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-123.2 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Board" means the Oklahoma State Board of Education;
2. "Department" means the Oklahoma State Department of
Education; and
3. "Education initiative" means a structured program aimed at
improving learning outcomes, solving specific educational
challenges, or designed to promote student achievement; and
4. "Qualifying entity" means any for-profit or nonprofit
corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, or
any other legal or commercial entity.

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 2

B. The Education Impact and Innovation Revolving Fund created
pursuant to Section 2 of this act shall be used for a competitive
grants pool to fund education initiatives meant to further and
improve the education of Oklahoma students. The Department shall
administer the competitive grant program. Contingent upon the
availability of funds in the Education Impact and Innovation
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 2 of this act, the Board
shall award one or more competitive grants to qualifying entities to
fund education initiatives to be implemented within this state.
C. 1. Grants shall be awarded to qualifying entities based on
a rubric designed by the Department and approved by the Board.
2. Grant applications shall include, but are not limited to:
a. a description of the education initiative,
b. what educational need the education initiative will
serve,
c. the dollar amount requested,
d. the population to be served,
e. what metrics will be used to evaluate the efficacy of
the education initiative, and
f. if the education initiative has already been
implemented in any school districts within this state,
the data from that education initiative and the
efficacy of the education initiative.

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 3

3. Before any grant application is evaluated by the Board, all
identifying information shall be removed from the grant application.
The Board shall score grant applications using the approved rubric
and rank the applications according to the evaluation score. Final
scores of the grant application shall be made public prior to any
vote by the Board. The Board shall vote to approve a grant
application and the amount to be awarded.
D. The Board shall promulgate rules as necessary to administer
the competitive grant program created in this section.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-123.3 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Department of Education to be designated the
"Education Impact and Innovation Revolving Fund". The fund shall be
a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received by the State Department of Education
from appropriations, gifts, grants, donations, and bequests. All
monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated
and may be budgeted and expended by the State Department of
Education for the purpose of implementing the provisions of Section
1 of this act. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 4

pres cribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026."
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate












ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 5

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 1338 By: Pugh and Hicks of the
Senate
and
Caldwell (Chad) and
Hasenbeck of the House


An Act relating to the Strong Readers Act; amending
Section 2, Chapter 288, O.S.L. 2023, as amended by
Section 9, Chapter 411, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1210.508H), which relates to literacy
instructional team; removing language establishing
three-year pilot program; prohibiting certain school
districts that decline certain assistance from being
eligible for certain funds; requiring biennial
submission of certain report; updating contents of
report; updating statutory language; providing an
effective date; and declaring an emergency.


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 288, O.S.L.
2023, as amended by Section 9, Chapter 411, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 1210.508H), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1210.508H. A. Beginning with the 2023-2024 school
year, the State Department of Education shall establish a three-year
pilot program to employ a literacy instructional team to support
school districts in implementation of the requirements of Section
1210.508C of this title. The Department shall provide technical
assistance for literacy instruction, dyslexia, and related
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 1

diso rders, and serve as a primary source of information and support
for schools in addressing the needs of students struggling with
literacy, dyslexia, and related disorders.
B. The Department shall employ a literacy instructional team
with team members who are placed regionally across the state. The
literacy instructional teams team members shall assist general
education and special education teachers in recognizing educational
needs to improve literacy outcomes for all students including those
with dyslexia or identified with the risk characteristics associated
with dyslexia. The role of the literacy instructional team shall
also include increasing professional awareness and instructional
competencies to meet the educational needs of all students including
those with dyslexia or identified with risk characteristics
associated with dyslexia. The Department shall prioritize supports
and interventions including enrollment in reading trainings and
professional development for schools which have the highest
percentage of students who do not demonstrate sufficient reading
skills as established by the State Board of Education. If a school
district that is prioritized for supports and interventions pursuant
to this subsection declines to accept assistance from a literacy
instructional team, the district shall not be eligible to receive
funds pursuant to Section 1210.508D of this title.
C. Literacy instructional team members employed by the
Department shall have training in:
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 2

1. The science of how students learn to read including
phonological awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, comprehension,
writing, and language;
2. Foundation of multisensory, explicit, systematic, and
structured reading instruction;
3. Identification of and the appropriate interventions,
accommodations, and teaching techniques for struggling students;
4. The requirements of the Strong Readers Act;
5. Special education laws and procedures; and
6. Appropriate interventions, accommodations, and assistive
technology supports for students with dyslexia or a related
disorder.
D. The literacy instructional team members employed by the
Department shall report to the Program Director for Literacy at the
Department and have:
1. A minimum of five regional literacy leads, including at
least one who shall be designated by the Department as a dyslexia
specialist to provide school districts with support and resources
that are necessary to assist students with dyslexia. The Department
shall give preference to educators applying for regional literacy
lead who:
a. have an endorsement or certification as a certified
structured literacy dyslexia specialist or certified
academic language therapist,
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 3

b. are knowledgeable of multitiered systems of support,
and
c. have been trained in the identification of and
intervention for dyslexia and related disorders
including best practice interventions and treatment
models for dyslexia; and
2. A minimum of ten literacy specialists. The Department shall
give preference to educators applying for literacy specialist who:
a. have training in the science of reading,
b. are knowledgeable of multitiered systems of support,
and
c. have been trained in the identification of and
intervention for dyslexia and related disorders
including best practice interventions and treatment
models for dyslexia.
E. The State Department of Education shall electronically
submit a report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by December
31, 2026, and by December 31 biennially thereafter, that includes an
evaluation of the pilot program literacy instructional team members
by school districts to which they were assigned, data on whether the
program literacy instructional team members had an impact on
increasing the number of students who demonstrate proficiency in
reading, and recommendations for changes to the Strong Readers Act.
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 4

SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives










ENGR. S. B. NO. 1338 Page 5